Maine, session 132, LD1912.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Authorization of bonds. The Treasurer of State is authorized, under the
direction of the Governor, to issue bonds in the name and on behalf of the State in an
amount not exceeding $60,000,000 for the purposes described in section 5 of this Part. The
bonds are a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State. The bonds may not run for a
period longer than 10 years from the date of the original issue of the bonds.
Sec. A-2. Records of bonds issued; Treasurer of State. The Treasurer of State
shall ensure that an account of each bond is kept showing the number of the bond, the name
of the successful bidder to whom sold, the amount received for the bond, the date of sale
and the date when payable.
Sec. A-3. Sale; how negotiated; proceeds appropriated. The Treasurer of
State may negotiate the sale of the bonds by direction of the Governor, but no bond may
be loaned, pledged or hypothecated on behalf of the State. The proceeds of the sale of the
bonds, which must be held by the Treasurer of State and paid by the Treasurer of State
upon warrants drawn by the State Controller, are appropriated solely for the purposes set
forth in this Part. Any unencumbered balances remaining at the completion of the project
in this Part lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of
general obligation bonds.
Sec. A-4. Interest and debt retirement. The Treasurer of State shall pay interest
due or accruing on any bonds issued under this Part and all sums coming due for payment
of bonds at maturity.
Sec. A-5. Disbursement of bond proceeds from General Fund bond issue.
The proceeds of the sale of the bonds authorized under this Part must be expended as
designated in the following schedule under the direction and supervision of the agencies
and entities set forth in this section.
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
Provides funds for the Innovative Housing Incentive Program under the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, section 13059-A to support manufacturers of manufactured and other
innovative housing in the State by providing grants for operating expenses, manufacture
of affordable and energy-efficient housing and low-interest loans to develop new
factories or expand existing factories by capitalizing the Home Accessibility and Repair
Program Fund.
Total $30,000,000
3387 MAINE STATE HOUSING AUTHORITY
Provides funds to support a home accessibility and repair program by capitalizing the
Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A,
section 4853.
Page 1 - 132LR0974(01)

Total $25,000,000
MAINE STATE HOUSING AUTHORITY
Provides funds for the Weatherization Plus Program under the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 30-A, section 4994-C to provide grants to eligible low-income households for
weatherization readiness and weatherization projects.
Total $2,500,000
MAINE STATE HOUSING AUTHORITY
Provides funds to support a pilot program to issue grants to nonprofit housing developers
to rehabilitate existing aging housing stock in the State for purchase by qualified first-
time home buyers.
Total $2,500,000
1121 Sec. A-6. Contingent upon ratification of bond issue. Sections 1 to 5 do not
1132 become effective unless the people of the State ratify the issuance of the bonds as set forth
1143 in this Part.
Sec. A-7. Appropriation balances at year-end. At the end of each fiscal year,
all unencumbered appropriation balances representing state money carry forward. Bond
proceeds that have not been expended within 10 years after the date of the sale of the bonds
lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of general
obligation bonds.
Sec. A-8. Bonds authorized but not issued. Any bonds authorized but not issued
within 5 years of ratification of this Part are deauthorized and may not be issued, except
that the Legislature may, within 2 years after the expiration of that 5-year period, extend
the period for issuing any remaining unissued bonds for an additional amount of time not
to exceed 5 years.
Sec. A-9. Referendum for ratification; submission at election; form of
question; effective date. This Part must be submitted to the legal voters of the State at
a statewide election held in the month of November following passage of this Act. The
municipal officers of this State shall notify the inhabitants of their respective cities, towns
and plantations to meet, in the manner prescribed by law for holding a statewide election,
to vote on the acceptance or rejection of this Part by voting on the following question:
"Do you favor a $60,000,000 bond issue to provide funds for the
Innovative Housing Incentive Program to support manufacturers of
manufactured and other innovative housing in the State by providing
grants for operating expenses, manufacture of affordable and energy
efficient housing and low-interest loans to develop new factories or expand
existing factories by capitalizing the Home Accessibility and Repair
Program Fund under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 13059-A,
provide funds to support a home accessibility and repair program by
capitalizing the Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund under the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4853, provide funds for the
Weatherization Plus Program to provide grants to eligible low-income
households for weatherization readiness and weatherization projects
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4994-C and
Page 2 - 132LR0974(01)

414 provide funds to support a pilot program to issue grants to nonprofit
425 housing developers to rehabilitate existing aging housing stock in the State
436 for purchase by qualified first-time home buyers?"
The legal voters of each city, town and plantation shall vote by ballot on this question
and designate their choice by a cross or check mark placed within a corresponding square
below the word "Yes" or "No." The ballots must be received, sorted, counted and declared
in open ward, town and plantation meetings and returns made to the Secretary of State in
the same manner as votes for members of the Legislature. The Governor shall review the
returns. If a majority of the legal votes are cast in favor of this Part, the Governor shall
proclaim the result without delay and this Part becomes effective 30 days after the date of
the proclamation.
The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish to each city, town and plantation all
ballots, returns and copies of this Part necessary to carry out the purposes of this
referendum.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 5 MRSA §13059-A is enacted to read:
§13059-A. Innovative Housing Incentive Program; Innovative Housing Incentive
Program Fund
1. Innovative Housing Incentive Program. The Innovative Housing Incentive
Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is administered by the department to
provide grants and factory loans to housing manufacturers located in the State.
2. Eligibility. A housing manufacturer is eligible for a grant or factory loan under the
program if the business:
A. Is located in the State;
B. Has 500 or fewer employees; and
C. Manufactures:
(1) One or more manufactured homes as defined in Title 10, section 9081,
subsection 1; or
(2) Housing in any other manner that the department determines to be innovative,
including prefabricated panelized construction, which may include structural
insulated panels or insulated concrete forms, 3-dimensional printed housing, a kit
home installed on a permanent foundation or a tiny home as defined in Title 29-A,
section 101, subsection 80-C installed on a permanent foundation. For purposes
of this subparagraph, "3-dimensional printed housing" means a housing unit
constructed using a digital file using a process in which construction material is
deposited, joined or solidified under computer control with the material being
added together typically layer by layer.
3. Grants. The department shall provide grants to eligible housing manufacturers
under subsection 2, including:
A. Reimbursement up to 20% of monthly operating expenses up to $350,000 per
housing manufacturer;
Page 3 - 132LR0974(01)

B. From $1,500 to $6,000 for every housing unit manufactured and installed in the
State. The department shall grant an amount in the higher end of the range under this
paragraph for a housing unit that is affordable and energy-efficient; and
C. A $50,000 bonus if an eligible housing manufacturer commits at least 10% of the
manufacturer's housing production to deed-restricted affordable housing.
The department may provide to an eligible housing manufacturer one or more grants under
this subsection.
4. Factory loans. The department shall provide a low-interest loan under a competitive
process to an eligible housing manufacturer under subsection 2 to support the development
of a new factory or the expansion of an existing factory dedicated to the manufacture of
housing under subsection 2, paragraph C. In awarding a loan under this subsection, the
department shall consider:
A. The percentage of affordable housing units to be produced by the factory;
B. The energy efficiency of the housing units produced by the factory;
C. The number and quality of jobs created by the development of the new factory or
the expansion of an existing factory;
D. The proposed terms of the loan; and
E. The financial health and qualifications of the applicant.
5. Innovative Housing Incentive Program Fund. The Innovative Housing Incentive
Program Fund, referred to in this subsection as "the fund," is established. The fund is
administered by the department. Disbursements from the fund must be provided equally to
support grants under subsection 3 and loans under subsection 4. The fund is a revolving,
nonlapsing, interest-bearing fund. Interest from investment of proceeds of the fund accrue
to the fund. The fund receives funds from bond proceeds, appropriations, allocations, gifts,
donations, interest from investments of bond funds and interest and principal derived from
loans made from the program and other revenue from public and private sources. Proceeds
of the fund may be used to support reasonable department expenses in administering the
program and the fund.
6. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. B-2. Contingent effective date. This Part does not take effect unless the
people of the State ratify the issuance of the bonds as set forth in Part A.
PART C
Sec. C-1. 30-A MRSA c. 201, sub-c. 15 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 15
WEATHERIZATION PLUS PROGRAM
§4994-C. Weatherization Plus Program
Page 4 - 132LR0974(01)

1. Program established. The Weatherization Plus Program, referred to in this
subchapter as "the program," is established within the Maine State Housing Authority, for
the purposes described in subsection 2. The program must be operated in conjunction with
other programs of the authority.
2. Purposes of program. The purposes of the program are to:
A. Help eligible low-income households implement energy conservation measures
through grants and the funding of weatherization readiness or weatherization projects.
For the purposes of this subchapter, "weatherization readiness" means the process to
protect a building from the outside weather elements and improve its energy efficiency;
B. Reduce the number of deferrals from the Weatherization Assistance for Low-income
Persons Program administered through the United States Department of Energy and
referenced in section 4741, subsection 15; and
C. Maximize the use of federal funding available for the purposes in paragraphs A and
B.
3. Program requirements. The Maine State Housing Authority shall establish
program requirements, including, but not limited to, requiring that an applicant for the
program must:
A. Meet the same household income eligibility requirements applicable to the
Weatherization Assistance for Low-income Persons Program administered through the
United States Department of Energy and implemented pursuant to section 4741,
subsection 15;
B. Demonstrate that the dwelling for which the funds are to be applied is a single-
family house or manufactured housing occupied by the applicant or another eligible
low-income household; and
C. For weatherization readiness projects, provide a substantiated expectation of the
dwelling being weatherized following completion of the weatherization readiness
project.
An approved applicant may be awarded a grant of up to $20,000.
§4994-D. Weatherization Plus Fund
The Weatherization Plus Fund, referred to in this subchapter as "the fund," is
established under the jurisdiction and control of the Maine State Housing Authority for the
purpose of providing funds for the program.
1. Sources of fund. Sources of the fund include:
A. All money appropriated for inclusion in the fund;
B. Subject to any pledge, contract or other obligation, any money that the Maine State
Housing Authority receives in repayment of advances from the fund;
C. Subject to any pledge, contract or other obligation, all interest, dividends and
pecuniary gains from investment of money of the fund; and
D. Any other money available to and directed by the Maine State Housing Authority
to be paid into the fund.
Page 5 - 132LR0974(01)

2. Revolving fund. The fund is a nonlapsing, revolving fund. The Maine State
Housing Authority shall continuously apply all money in the fund to carry out the purposes
of this subchapter.
Sec. C-2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Weatherization Plus Fund N505
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for grants to eligible low-income households for
weatherization readiness and weatherization projects pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 30-A, chapter 201, subchapter 15.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,500,000 $0
1151 Sec. C-3. Contingent effective date. This Part does not take effect unless the
1162 people of the State ratify the issuance of the bonds as set forth in Part A.
PART D
Sec. D-1. Maine State Housing Authority to create pilot program. The
Maine State Housing Authority shall create a pilot program, referred to in this Part as "the
program," to issue grants to nonprofit housing developers to rehabilitate existing aging
housing stock in the State. The program must rehabilitate 15 units, and a grant issued by
the program may be in an amount up to $80,000 per unit.
Sec. D-2. Program grant uses. A grant issued to a nonprofit housing developer
under the program may be used to rehabilitate an existing single-family or multifamily
dwelling unit. Renovation projects eligible under a grant include lead paint mitigation,
energy efficiency improvement or upgrading and repairing or replacing the unit's:
1. Well;
2. Heating system;
3. Electrical system;
4. Roof;
5. Chimney;
6. Structure;
7. Windows;
8. Doors;
9. Siding; and
10. Accessibility for persons with disabilities or persons who experience physical
barriers in living in the unit.
Sec. D-3. Home buyer eligibility. A single-family or multifamily dwelling unit
renovated by the program must be available for purchase by a first-time home buyer who
Page 6 - 132LR0974(01)

410 will occupy the unit and has an income that does not exceed 120% of the area median
421 income and who agrees that:
1. If the home buyer sells the unit within the first 12 months of ownership, the home
buyer retains 25% of any profit gained from the sale and 75% of the profit is returned to
the nonprofit housing developer that received a grant under section 2;
2. If the home buyer sells the unit within the first 13 to 24 months of ownership, the
home buyer retains 50% of any profit gained from the sale and 50% of the profit is returned
to the nonprofit housing developer that received a grant under section 2;
3. If the home buyer sells the unit within the first 25 to 36 months of ownership, the
home buyer retains 75% of any profit gained from the sale and 25% of the profit is returned
to the nonprofit housing developer that received a grant under section 2; and
4. If the home buyer sells the unit after 36 months of ownership, the home buyer retains
100% of any profit gained from the sale.
Sec. D-4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Existing Housing Stock Rehabilitation Program N510
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for a pilot program that provides grants to nonprofit
housing developers to rehabilitate existing aging housing stock for purchase by qualified
first-time home buyers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,500,000 $0
2251 Sec. D-5. Contingent effective date. This Part does not take effect unless the
2262 people of the State ratify the issuance of the bonds as set forth in Part A.